District of Columbia statutes.
16-1337

Construction of subchapter.

This subchapter does not repeal any provisions of existing law pertaining to the condemnation or acquisition of streets, alleys, or land, or the law or laws relating to the subdividing of lands in the District of Columbia.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 577, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 558, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(f)(11)

Cross References

Acquisition of mass transit bus systems, condemnation proceedings, see § 9-1113.06.
Eminent domain, jurisdiction, District Court, see § 16-1301.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-1337.
1973 Ed., § 16-1337.